Utah statutes.
11-13-202.   Agreements for joint or cooperative action, for providing or
exchanging services, or for law enforcement services -- Effective date of
agreement -- Public agencies may restrict their authority or exempt each other
regarding permits and fees.
(1)  Any two or more public agencies may enter into an agreement with one
another under this chapter:
(a)  for joint or cooperative action;
(b)  to provide services that they are each authorized by statute to provide;
(c)  to exchange services that they are each authorized by statute to provide;
(d)  for a public agency to provide law enforcement services to one or more
other public agencies, if the public agency providing law enforcement services
under the interlocal agreement is authorized by law to provide those services,
or to provide joint or cooperative law enforcement services between or among
public agencies that are each authorized by law to provide those services; or
(e)  to do anything else that they are each authorized by statute to do.
(2)  An agreement under Subsection (1) does not take effect until it has been
approved, as provided in Section 11-13-202.5, by each public agency that is a
party to it.
(3) (a)  In an agreement under Subsection (1), a public agency that is a party
to the agreement may agree:
(i)  to restrict its authority to issue permits to or assess fees from another
public agency that is a party to the agreement; and
(ii)  to exempt another public agency that is a party to the agreement from
permit or fee requirements.
(b)  A provision in an agreement under Subsection (1) whereby the parties
agree as provided in Subsection (3)(a) is subject to all remedies provided by
law and in the agreement, including injunction, mandamus, abatement, or other
remedy to prevent, enjoin, abate, or enforce the provision.
(4)  An interlocal agreement between a county and one or more municipalities
for law enforcement service within an area that includes some or all of the
unincorporated area of the county shall require the law enforcement service
provided under the agreement to be provided by or under the direction of the
county sheriff.
